Washington statutes.
RCW 11.40.010

Claims—Presentation—Other notice not affected.

A person having a claim against the decedent may not maintain an action on the claim unless a personal representative has been appointed and the claimant has presented the claim as set forth in this chapter. However, this chapter does not affect the notice under RCW 82.32.240 or the ability to maintain an action against a notice agent under chapter 11.42 RCW.

[ 1997 c 252 s 7; 1995 1st sp.s. c 18 s 58; 1994 c 221 s 25; 1991 c 5 s 1; 1989 c 333 s 1; 1974 ex.s. c 117 s 33; 1967 c 168 s 7; 1965 c 145 s 11.40.010. Prior: 1923 c 142 s 3; 1917 c 156 s 107; RRS s 1477; prior: Code 1881 s 1465; 1860 p 195 s 157; 1854 p 280 s 78.]

NOTES:

Application—1997 c 252 ss 1-73: See note following RCW 11.02.005.

Conflict with federal requirements—Severability—Effective date—1995 1st sp.s. c 18: See notes following RCW 74.39A.030.

Effective dates—1994 c 221: See note following RCW 11.100.035.

Application—Effective date—1989 c 333: "This act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or the support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and shall take effect immediately [May 11, 1989]. This act shall apply to probate proceedings that are open on or are commenced after the effective date, except that section 5 of this act shall apply only to decedents dying after the effective date." [ 1989 c 333 s 9.]

Application, construction—Severability—Effective date—1974 ex.s. c 117: See RCW 11.02.080 and notes following.

Publication of legal notices: Chapter 65.16 RCW.